West Virginia, session 2025, SB709.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 5F. REORGANIZATION OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT. ARTICLE 2. TRANSFER OF AGENCIES AND BOARDS. §5F-2-8. Special merit-based personnel system for Department of Transportation employees. [Repealed.] CHAPTER 11B. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. ARTICLE 1. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. §11B-1-8. Special employment procedures for Tax Division personnel. [Repealed.] CHAPTER 49. CHILD WELFARE. ARTICLE 10. EXEMPTION FROM WEST VIRGINIA DIVISON OF PERSONNEL. §1.  Repeal of article relating to exemption from West Virginia Division of Personnel. That §49-10-101 through §49-10-103 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed.